Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 10 TLSB 2488YC (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.11, subsections 2, 3, and 4, Code 1 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. The kindergarten program shall include experiences 3 designed to develop healthy emotional and social habits and 4 growth in the language arts and communication skills, as well 5 as a capacity for the completion of individual tasks, and 6 protect and increase physical well-being with attention given 7 to experiences relating to the development of life skills and, 8 subject to section 279.80 , age-appropriate and research-based 9 human growth and development. The kindergarten program shall 10 also include instruction related to nutrition that emphasizes 11 all of the following: 12 (1) The importance of animal-based protein, dairy, 13 vegetables, and fruit. 14 (2) The nutritional benefits of animal-based protein, 15 dairy, vegetables, and fruit. 16 (3) The role that animal-based protein, dairy, vegetables, 17 and fruit play in a balanced diet. 18 b. A kindergarten teacher shall be licensed to teach in 19 kindergarten. 20 c. An accredited nonpublic school must meet the requirements 21 of this subsection only if the nonpublic school offers a 22 kindergarten program; provided, however, that section 279.80 23 shall not apply to a nonpublic school. 24 3. a. The following areas shall be taught in grades 25 one through six: English-language arts, social studies, 26 mathematics, science, health, physical education, traffic 27 safety, music, visual art, and, subject to section 279.80 , 28 age-appropriate and research-based human growth and 29 development. The health curriculum shall include all of the 30 following: 31 (1) The characteristics of communicable diseases. 32 (2) Instruction related to nutrition that emphasizes all of 33 the following: 34 (a) The importance of animal-based protein, dairy, 35 -1- LSB 2488YC (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 9 H.F. _____ vegetables, and fruit. 1 (b) The nutritional benefits of animal-based protein, 2 dairy, vegetables, and fruit. 3 (c) The role that animal-based protein, dairy, vegetables, 4 and fruit play in a balanced diet. 5 b. Computer science instruction incorporating the standards 6 established under section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph 7 âaâ , subparagraph (4), shall be offered in at least one grade 8 level commencing with the school year beginning July 1, 2023. 9 The health curriculum shall include the characteristics of 10 communicable diseases. 11 c. The state board as part of accreditation standards shall 12 adopt curriculum definitions for implementing the elementary 13 program. 14 4. a. The following shall be taught in grades seven and 15 eight: English-language arts; social studies, including 16 instruction related to civics; mathematics; science; 17 health; age-appropriate and research-based human growth and 18 development; career exploration and development; physical 19 education; music; and visual art. 20 (1) Career exploration and development shall be designed 21 so that students are appropriately prepared to create an 22 individual career and academic plan pursuant to section 23 279.61, incorporate foundational career and technical 24 education concepts aligned with the six career and technical 25 education service areas as defined in subsection 5, paragraph 26 âhâ , incorporate relevant twenty-first century skills to 27 facilitate career readiness, and introduce students to career 28 opportunities within the local community and across this state. 29 This subparagraph shall not apply to the teaching of career 30 exploration and development in nonpublic schools. 31 (2) The health curriculum shall include all of the 32 following: 33 (a) Age-appropriate and research-based information 34 regarding the characteristics of sexually transmitted diseases. 35 -2- LSB 2488YC (3) 91 jda/jh 2/ 9 H.F. _____ (b) Instruction related to nutrition that emphasizes all of 1 the following: 2 (i) The importance of animal-based protein, dairy, 3 vegetables, and fruit. 4 (ii) The nutritional benefits of animal-based protein, 5 dairy, vegetables, and fruit. 6 (iii) The role that animal-based protein, dairy, 7 vegetables, and fruit play in a balanced diet. 8 b. Computer science instruction incorporating the standards 9 established under section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , 10 subparagraph (4), shall be offered in at least one grade level 11 commencing with the school year beginning July 1, 2023. Career 12 exploration and development shall be designed so that students 13 are appropriately prepared to create an individual career 14 and academic plan pursuant to section 279.61 , incorporate 15 foundational career and technical education concepts aligned 16 with the six career and technical education service areas as 17 defined in subsection 5 , paragraph âhâ , incorporate relevant 18 twenty-first century skills to facilitate career readiness, 19 and introduce students to career opportunities within the 20 local community and across this state. The health curriculum 21 shall include age-appropriate and research-based information 22 regarding the characteristics of sexually transmitted diseases. 23 c. The state board as part of accreditation standards shall 24 adopt curriculum definitions for implementing the program in 25 grades seven and eight. However, this subsection shall not 26 apply to the teaching of career exploration and development in 27 nonpublic schools. 28 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph h, 29 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 (a) Agriculture, food, and natural resources , which shall 32 include instruction related to food production, the benefits of 33 local sourcing, and sustainable farming practices . 34 Sec. 3. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph j, 35 -3- LSB 2488YC (3) 91 jda/jh 3/ 9 H.F. _____ subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1 (1) One unit of health education which may include personal 2 health; food and nutrition; environmental health; safety and 3 survival skills; consumer health; family life; age-appropriate 4 and research-based human growth and development; substance 5 use disorder and nonuse; emotional and social health; health 6 resources; cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and prevention 7 and control of disease, including age-appropriate and 8 research-based information regarding sexually transmitted 9 diseases. The one unit of health education shall include 10 instruction related to nutrition that emphasizes all of the 11 following: 12 (a) The importance of animal-based protein, dairy, 13 vegetables, and fruit. 14 (b) The nutritional benefits of animal-based protein, 15 dairy, vegetables, and fruit. 16 (c) The role that animal-based protein, dairy, vegetables, 17 and fruit play in a balanced diet. 18 Sec. 4. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 19 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 20 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (01) The educational standards 21 established in section 256.11, subsections 2, 3, and 4, and 22 section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âjâ , subparagraph (1), 23 related to instruction on nutrition. 24 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (3) The educational standards 25 established in section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âhâ , 26 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), related to 27 instruction relating to food production, the benefits of local 28 sourcing, and sustainable farming practices. 29 Sec. 5. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 30 by adding the following new paragraphs: 31 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0p. Be subject to and comply with the 32 requirements of section 256.11, subsections 2, 3, and 4, and 33 section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âjâ , subparagraph (1), 34 related to instruction on nutrition in the same manner as a 35 -4- LSB 2488YC (3) 91 jda/jh 4/ 9 H.F. _____ school district. 1 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 2 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph 3 âhâ , subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), related to 4 instruction relating to food production, the benefits of local 5 sourcing, and sustainable farming practices in the same manner 6 as a school district. 7 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 283A.14 Application for waiver ââ 8 updated nutritional guidelines ââ joint committee. 9 1. The general assembly finds and declares all of the 10 following: 11 a. The nutritional needs and cultural preferences of 12 the students in Iowa might be better served by localizing 13 nutritional standards. 14 b. Unique regional food sources, including corn, pork, and 15 dairy, are not adequately addressed by federal guidelines. 16 c. Flexibility in nutritional standards can enhance the 17 ability of schools to provide meals that are both nutritious 18 and appealing to students, which may increase student 19 participation in school breakfast and lunch programs. 20 2. Within ninety days after the effective date of this Act, 21 the department of education shall apply for a waiver under the 22 provisions of the federal National School Lunch Act of 1966, 42 23 U.S.C. Â§1751 et seq., and the federal Child Nutrition Act of 24 1966, 42 U.S.C. Â§1771 et seq., to request all of the following: 25 a. An exemption from sodium limits, whole grain 26 requirements, and fruit and vegetable variety stipulations in 27 school breakfast and lunch programs. 28 b. Permission to substitute or modify federal requirements 29 with state-specific nutritional guidelines that align with 30 Iowaâs dietary recommendations or cultural food practices. 31 3. If the waiver applied for by the department of 32 education under subsection 2 is granted, the department of 33 education shall adopt updated guidelines for what constitutes 34 a nutritionally adequate meal. The department shall consult 35 -5- LSB 2488YC (3) 91 jda/jh 5/ 9 H.F. _____ with the department of agriculture and land stewardship, 1 experts in nutrition, educators, parents, local farmers, and 2 other stakeholders during the process of adopting updated 3 guidelines for what constitutes a nutritionally adequate meal. 4 The guidelines for what constitutes a nutritionally adequate 5 meal may reflect local preferences, regional food sources, 6 including corn, pork, and dairy, and cultural considerations. 7 The guidelines for what constitutes a nutritionally adequate 8 meal must satisfy all of the following requirements: 9 a. Be at least as stringent in promoting health and 10 preventing chronic diseases as the federal guidelines. 11 b. Maintain a commitment to nutritional health and student 12 well-being. 13 c. Prioritize the following food groups, in the order 14 listed: 15 (1) Animal-based protein, including but not limited to 16 beef, pork, poultry, fish, and eggs. 17 (2) Dairy products, including but not limited to milk, 18 cheese, and yogurt. 19 (3) Vegetables, including but not limited to local and 20 seasonal produce. 21 (4) Fresh fruit or dried or frozen fruit when fresh fruit is 22 not seasonally available. 23 4. If the waiver applied for by the department of education 24 under subsection 2 is granted, the department of education 25 and the department of agriculture and land stewardship shall 26 establish a joint committee to do all of the following: 27 a. Oversee the implementation of the guidelines for what 28 constitutes a nutritionally adequate meal. 29 b. Review the outcomes associated with the guidelines for 30 what constitutes a nutritionally adequate meal. 31 c. Study the nutritional science associated with the 32 guidelines for what constitutes a nutritionally adequate meal 33 and seek feedback from schools, parents, and agricultural 34 stakeholders related to the guidelines. 35 -6- LSB 2488YC (3) 91 jda/jh 6/ 9 H.F. _____ d. Provide recommendations to the department of education 1 related to changes that may need to be made to the guidelines 2 for what constitutes a nutritionally adequate meal. 3 5. If the waiver applied for by the department of 4 education under subsection 2 is granted, the department of 5 education shall submit to the general assembly an annual 6 report, beginning on or before the first June 30 after 7 the implementation of the new guidelines, which describes 8 the impact of the guidelines related to what constitutes a 9 nutritionally adequate meal, including information related 10 to school breakfast and lunch program participation, student 11 health outcomes, feedback from school districts, progress 12 in implementing the guidelines, challenges associated with 13 implementing the guidelines, and recommendations for further 14 enhancement of the guidelines. 15 6. If the waiver applied for by the department of education 16 under subsection 2 is granted, the department of education 17 shall conduct an evaluation to assess the effectiveness of the 18 guidelines for what constitutes a nutritionally adequate meal 19 compared to the comparable federal standards within five years 20 after the effective date of the waiver. 21 Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 22 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment: 23 The section of this Act enacting section 283A.14. 24